Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 7. Historic or Scenic Sites, Roadside Rests, and Beaches.

Collateral references. —

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parks, Squares, and Playgrounds, §§ 20-27.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 260, 262.

Sec. 41.21.800.
Selection of sites.

The department and the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall jointly select sites of ten acres or less for their historic or scenic value, or for recreation beaches along waterways, roadside rests for travelers resting, camping, or parking, and determine what facilities are necessary or desirable at these sites.
Selection of the sites for roadside rests and recreation beaches shall be based upon the flow of traffic and distances to and between facilities otherwise provided.
Insofar as possible, sites shall be located on, or adjacent to, highway rights-of-way and small boat waterways. The department may acquire the sites jointly selected by grant, gift, purchase, lease, dedication, or prescription and hold them in the name of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 174 SLA 1955; am E.O. No. 39, § 11 (1977))

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.050. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.805.
Construction and maintenance of facilities.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may construct and maintain facilities at scenic sites, recreation beaches or roadside rests as are determined to be necessary and desirable. Facilities may include, but are not limited to, access roads, camp facilities, including picnic tables, fireplaces and toilets, camping areas or other facilities that are considered necessary and desirable for the convenience and benefit of travelers and small boat operators.

History.

(§ 2 ch 174 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.060. Renumbered in 1983.